Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF894.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.04, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Citizenship requirements. (a) Eligibility for MinnesotaCare is deleted text begin availabledeleted text end new text begin limitednew text end to citizens or nationals of the United Statesdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin andnew text end lawfully present noncitizens as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 155.20deleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end Undocumented noncitizensnew text begin are ineligible for MinnesotaCarenew text end . For purposes of this subdivision, an undocumented noncitizen is an individual who resides in the United States without the approval or acquiescence of the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. Families with children who are citizens or nationals of the United States must cooperate in obtaining satisfactory documentary evidence of citizenship or nationality according to the requirements of the federal Deficit Reduction Act of 2005, Public Law 109-171. (b) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 and 7, eligible persons include families and individuals who arenew text begin lawfully present andnew text end ineligible for medical assistance by reason of immigration status and who have incomes equal to or less than 200 percent of federal poverty guidelinesdeleted text begin , except that these persons may be eligible for emergency medical assistance under section 256B.06, subdivision 4deleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end